Massachusetts, session 194th, S1015.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 30 of Chapter 23B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (G) the following subsection:-
(H) The executive office of housing and livable communities shall implement a policy to
identify any families or individuals in the emergency housing assistance program, including
those residing in overflow shelters, that have a financial sponsor under federal immigration law.
For any families or individuals identified as has having a financial sponsor, the executive
office shall, in consultation with the office of the attorney general, seek reimbursement of any
funds that should have been covered by the financial sponsor through legal action against the
financial sponsor.
of 1